Utah statutes.
32B-6-702.   Definitions.

As used in this part, "recreational amenity" is defined by the commission by rule made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.  A rule made under this section shall define "recreational amenity" to be one or more of the following or an activity substantially similar to one of the following:

(1)  a billiard parlor;

(2)  a pool parlor;

(3)  a bowling facility;

(4)  a golf course;

(5)  miniature golf;

(6)  a golf driving range;

(7)  a tennis club;

(8)  a sports facility that hosts professional sporting events and has a seating capacity equal to or greater than 6,500;

(9)  a concert venue that has a seating capacity equal to or greater than 6,500;

(10)  one of the following if owned by a government agency:

(a)  a convention center;

(b)  a fair facility;

(c)  an equestrian park;

(d)  a theater; or

(e)  a concert venue;

(11)  an amusement park:

(a)  with one or more permanent amusement rides; and

(b)  located on at least 50 acres;

(12)  a ski resort;

(13)  a venue for live entertainment if the venue:

(a)  is not regularly open for more than five hours on any day;

(b)  is operated so that food is available whenever beer is sold, offered for sale, or furnished at the venue; and

(c)  is operated so that no more than 15% of its total annual receipts are from the sale of beer; or

(14)  concessions operated within the boundary of a park administered by the:

(a)  Division of Parks and Recreation; or

(b)  National Parks Service.



Amended by Chapter 2, 2011 Special Session 2

